Washington statutes.
RCW 6.15.070

Procedure if value of property claimed exempt exceeds exemptible value.

If from an appraisal it appears that the value of the property claimed exempt, exclusive of liens and encumbrances, exceeds the exemptible value and the property is indivisible, the property shall be put up for sale on execution, but at the sale no bid may be received unless it exceeds the exempt value. The proceeds of a sale in excess of the exempt value shall be paid, first, to the debtor to the extent of the exempt amount; second, up to the amount of the execution, to the satisfaction of the execution; third, the balance to be paid to the debtor. A judgment creditor who is the successful bidder at the sale must pay the exempt amount in cash.

[ 1987 c 442 s 307.]